Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4271.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 27. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all independent committees that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by an individual who is a candidate for or a member of the house of representatives or the senate of this state are treated as a single independent committee for the purposes of the limitations under section 52. An individual does not establish, finance, maintain, or control a committee under this section by merely making a contribution to the committee. This section does not apply to house political party caucus committees and senate political party caucus committees. (2) A person that knowingly violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable, if the person is an individual, by imprisonment for not more than 3 years, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both, or, if the person is not an individual, by a fine of not more than $10,000.00.